src/morphology/stems/adj.lexc
LEXICON ADJ_SYMPPIS
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 39
!!€  symppis: symppis+A+Sg+Nom # sympathetic
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:kse  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:ks  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:kse  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:ks  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:ks  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:s  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:ks  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:kse  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ks  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_LÄHTEISYYS
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 40
!!€  lähteisyys: lähteisyys+A+Sg+Nom # sourceful
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:te  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:de  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ks  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:te  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:ks  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:ks  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:ks  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:de  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ks  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_AUTUAS
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 41 as
!!€  autuas: autuas+A+Sg+Nom # ignorant
0:s  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_VALMIS
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 41 is
!!€  valmis: valmis+A+Sg+Nom # ready
0:s  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

:ihi  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS_ARCHAIC  ;
:eh  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE_ARCHAIC  ;

:is  ADJ_BACK_ESSIVE_NA_ARCHAIC  ;
+Use/NG:is  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN_ARCHAIC  ;


LEXICON ADJ_TIIVIS

0:i  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:i  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

0:ihi  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS_ARCHAIC  ;

0:ii  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:ii  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;

0:is  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:is  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:is  ADJ_FRONT_ESSIVE_NÄ_ARCHAIC  ;
+Use/NG:is  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN_ARCHAIC  ;
0:is  ADJ_COMPOUND_0  ;

:e  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

:eh  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE_ARCHAIC  ;

:ihi  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE_ARCHAIC  ;

:ii  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;


LEXICON ADJ_TYÖLÄS
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 41 äs
!!€  työläs: työläs+A+Sg+Nom # studious
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_VOIMAKAS
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 41 kas
!!€  voimakas: voimakas+A+Sg+Nom # powerfui
0:as  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:kaa  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:as  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:kaa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ka  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:kaa  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_TYYLIKÄS
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 41 käs
!!€  tyylikäs: tyylikäs+A+Sg+Nom # stylish
0:äs  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:kää  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:äs  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:kää  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:kä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:kää  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_REIPAS
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 41 pas
!!€  reipas: reipas+A+Sg+Nom 
0:as  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:paa  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:as  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:paa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:pa  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:paa  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  No adjectives end in -päs

LEXICON ADJ_RIETAS
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 41 tas
!!€  rietas: rietas+A+Sg+Nom # lewd
0:as  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:taa  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:as  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:taa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ta  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:taa  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_RAITIS
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 41 tis
!!€  raitis: raitis+A+Sg+Nom # sober
0:is  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tii  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ti  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:is  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:tii  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:ti  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:ti  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ti  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ti  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ti  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:tii  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  Gaps.

LEXICON ADJ_HIDAS
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 41 das
!!€  hidas: hidas+A+Sg+Nom # slow
0:das  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:taa  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:das  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:taa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ta  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:taa  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  Gaps

LEXICON ADJ_HARRAS
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 41 ras
!!€  harras: harras+A+Sg+Nom # humble
0:ras  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:taa  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:ras  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:taa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ta  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:taa  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  !t-finals

LEXICON ADJ_OHUT
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 43 back
!!€  ohut: ohut+A+Sg+Nom # thin
0:t  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_EHYT
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 43 front
!!€  ehyt: ehyt+A+Sg+Nom # unbroken
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  !Lexicalised nut-participles
!!  Majority of lexicalised nut participles are adjectives.

LEXICON ADJ_KULUNUT
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 47 back
!!€  kulunut: kulunut+A+Sg+Nom # used
0:ut  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ee  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:ut  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:ee  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:e  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ee  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJECTIVE
ahdas+A:ah  ADJ_HIDAS  ;
altis+A:alt  ADJ_RAITIS  ;
aulis+A:aul  ADJ_VALMIS  ;
eloonjäänyt+A:eloonjääny  ADJ_EHYT  ;
eloonjäänyt+A:eloonjääny  ADJ_OHUT  ;
epäaistikas+A:epäaistik  ADJ_VOIMAKAS  ;
epäkohtelias+A:epäkohtelia  ADJ_AUTUAS  ;
epäpuhdas+A:epäpuh  ADJ_HIDAS  ;
epäpuhdas+A:epä#puh  ADJ_HIDAS  ;
haavoittunut+A:haavoittun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
harras+A:har  ADJ_HARRAS  ;
henkiinjäänyt+A:henkiinjääny  ADJ_EHYT  ;
henkäyksenohut+A:henkäyksenohu  ADJ_OHUT  ;
henkäyksenohut+A:henkäyksen#ohu  ADJ_OHUT  ;
hidas+A:hi  ADJ_HIDAS  ;
hinnakas+A:hinnak  ADJ_VOIMAKAS  ;
huippuälykäs+A:huippu#älyk  ADJ_TYYLIKÄS  ;
huumaantunut+A:huumaantun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
höyhenenkevyt+A:höyhenenkevy  ADJ_EHYT  ;
höyhenenkevyt+A:höyhenen#kevy  ADJ_EHYT  ;
ilmatiivis+A:ilma#tiiv  ADJ_TIIVIS  ;
ilmatiivis+A:ilmatiivi  ADJ_VALMIS  ;
irstas+A:irsta  ADJ_AUTUAS  ;
juonteikas+A:juonteik  ADJ_VOIMAKAS  ;
kaasutiivis+A:kaasutiiv  ADJ_TIIVIS  ;
kaasutiivis+A:kaasu#tiiv  ADJ_TIIVIS  ;
kallis+A:kall  ADJ_VALMIS  ;
karannut+A:karann  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
katuälykäs+A:katu#älyk  ADJ_TYYLIKÄS  ;
kaunis+A:kaun  ADJ_VALMIS  ;
kekseliäs+A:kekseliä  ADJ_TYÖLÄS  ;
kernas+A:kerna  ADJ_AUTUAS  ;
kolmivuotias+A:kolmivuotia  ADJ_AUTUAS  ;
kovettunut+A:kovettun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
kristallinkirkas+A:kristallinkirk  ADJ_VOIMAKAS  ;
kullankallis+A:kullankall  ADJ_VALMIS  ;
kuvankaunis+A:kuvankaun  ADJ_VALMIS  ;
käytteliäs+A:käytteliä  ADJ_TYÖLÄS  ;
kääväkäs+A:kääväk  ADJ_TYYLIKÄS  ;
köynneliäs+A:köynneliä  ADJ_TYÖLÄS  ;
lajirikas+A:lajirik  ADJ_VOIMAKAS  ;
liimautunut+A:liimautun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
luonnikas+A:luonnik  ADJ_VOIMAKAS  ;
lyhyt+A:lyhy  ADJ_EHYT  ;
lyijynraskas+A:lyijyn#raska  ADJ_AUTUAS  ;
tyhjänpäiväisyys+A:tyhjänpäiväisyy ADJ_LÄHTEISYYS  ;
lähteisyys+A:lähteisyy  ADJ_LÄHTEISYYS  ;
marras+A:mar  ADJ_HARRAS  ;
merimiehekäs+A:meri#miehek  ADJ_TYYLIKÄS  ;
mietteliäs+A:mietteliä  ADJ_TYÖLÄS  ;
mukaantullut+A:mukaantullu  ADJ_OHUT  ;
mukanaollut+A:mukanaollu  ADJ_OHUT  ;
muotokaunis+A:muotokaun  ADJ_VALMIS  ;
nelivuotias+A:nelivuotia  ADJ_AUTUAS  ;
niljakas+A:niljak  ADJ_VOIMAKAS  ;
nolostunut+A:nolostun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
ohut+A:ohu  ADJ_OHUT  ;
palvelualtis+A:palvelualt  ADJ_RAITIS  ;
palvelualtis+A:palvelu#alt  ADJ_RAITIS  ;
paperinohut+A:paperinohu  ADJ_OHUT  ;
paperinohut+A:paperin#ohu  ADJ_OHUT  ;
piikikäs+A:piikik  ADJ_TYYLIKÄS  ;
pisteliäs+A:pisteliä  ADJ_TYÖLÄS  ;
puhdas+A:puh  ADJ_HIDAS  ;
pumpulinkevyt+A:pumpulinkevy  ADJ_EHYT  ;
putipuhdas+A:putipuh  ADJ_HIDAS  ;
puutunut+A:puutun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
pölytiivis+A:pölytiiv  ADJ_TIIVIS  ;
pölytiivis+A:pöly#tiiv  ADJ_TIIVIS  ;
raitis+A:rait  ADJ_RAITIS  ;
raivoraitis+A:raivorait  ADJ_RAITIS  ;
raivoraitis+A:raivo#rait  ADJ_RAITIS  ;
rasvatiivis+A:rasvatiiv  ADJ_TIIVIS  ;
rautias+A:rautia  ADJ_AUTUAS  ;
rehvakas+A:rehvak  ADJ_VOIMAKAS  ;
reipas+A:reip  ADJ_REIPAS  ;
rietas+A:riet  ADJ_RIETAS  ;
riskialtis+A:riskialt  ADJ_RAITIS  ;
riskialtis+A:riski#alt  ADJ_RAITIS  ;
rytmikäs+A:rytmik  ADJ_TYYLIKÄS  ;
sammunut+A:sammun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
sanavalmis+A:sanavalmi  ADJ_VALMIS  ;
satavuotias+A:satavuotia  ADJ_AUTUAS  ;
seitinohut+A:seitinohu  ADJ_OHUT  ;
seitinohut+A:seitin#ohu  ADJ_OHUT  ;
symppis+A:symppi  ADJ_SYMPPIS  ;
särmikäs+A:särmik  ADJ_TYYLIKÄS  ;
säästeliäs+A:säästeliä  ADJ_TYÖLÄS  ;
tapahtumarikas+A:tapahtumarik  ADJ_VOIMAKAS  ;
tiivis+A:tiiv  ADJ_TIIVIS  ;
tilanneraitis+A:tilannerait  ADJ_RAITIS  ;
tilanneraitis+A:tilanne#rait  ADJ_RAITIS  ;
toimelias+A:toimelia  ADJ_AUTUAS  ;
toimitusvalmis+A:toimitusvalm  ADJ_VALMIS  ;
tyyris+A:tyyr  ADJ_TIIVIS  ;
työläs+A:työlä  ADJ_TYÖLÄS  ;
työteliäs+A:työteliä  ADJ_TYÖLÄS  ;
tähdikäs+A:tähdik  ADJ_TYYLIKÄS  ;
ultrakevyt+A:ultrakevy  ADJ_EHYT  ;
ultralyhyt+A:ultralyhy  ADJ_EHYT  ;
untuvankevyt+A:untuvankevy  ADJ_EHYT  ;
uunivalmis+A:uuni#valmi  ADJ_VALMIS  ;
vaitelias+A:vaitelia  ADJ_AUTUAS  ;
valkuaisrikas+A:valkuaisrik  ADJ_VOIMAKAS  ;
valpas+A:valp  ADJ_REIPAS  ;
vannoutunut+A:vannoutun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
veres+A:vere  ADJ_SYMPPIS  ;
vesitiivis+A:vesitiiv  ADJ_TIIVIS  ;
vesitiivis+A:vesi#tiiv  ADJ_TIIVIS  ;
viitseliäs+A:viitseliä  ADJ_TYÖLÄS  ;
vilpas+A:vilp  ADJ_REIPAS  ;
väekäs+A:väek  ADJ_TYYLIKÄS  ;
yritteliäs+A:yritteliä  ADJ_TYÖLÄS  ;
äkämys+A:äkämy  ADJ_SYMPPIS  ;
ärhäkäs+A:ärhäk  ADJ_TYYLIKÄS  ;
